Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5342.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 72.01 RCW to read as follows:(1) Access to state owned and operated facilities by members of the Washington legislature aids members in the effective exercise of their legislative functions and roles. The legislature recognizes that access to secure facilities, including those requesting to meet with incarcerated individuals, can require advance planning to ensure safety and minimize potential impacts on facility operations.(2) Upon receiving a written request from a currently elected member or appointed member of the Washington legislature to visit a state owned and operated facility, the department of corrections, the department of children, youth, and families, and the department of social and health services shall make reasonable efforts to facilitate the visit within the requested time frame. If the visit cannot be facilitated within the requested time frame, the agency shall provide the requesting member a prompt, written response explaining the reasons why the visit cannot be facilitated as requested, and the earliest date when the visit may occur.(3) Access includes a tour of the state facility or to meet with a constituent residing in the facility.Â Access to family events at the facility are managed on a case-by-case basis with priority attendance given to family members of individuals who reside at the facility.(4) All visitors to state facilities must adhere to safety and security protocols outlined by department policy and staff prior to and during the visit.--- END ---